Vermont, session 2025-2026, H173.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 903 is amended to read:
§ 903. EMPLOYEES’ RIGHTS AND DUTIES; PROHIBITED ACTS
* * *
(b) A State employee may not strike or recognize a picket line of an
employee or labor organization while in the performance of his or her the
employee’s official duties; provided, however, that this prohibition shall not
apply to employees of the Vermont State Colleges or the University of
Vermont.
* * *
VT LEG #379715 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.173
2025 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 962 is amended to read:
§ 962. EMPLOYEES
It shall be an unfair labor practice for an employee organization or its
agents:
* * *
(5) To engage in, or to induce or encourage any individual employed by
any person to engage in, a strike or a refusal in the course of his or her the
individual’s employment to use, transport, or otherwise handle or work on any
goods, articles, materials, or commodities or to perform any authorized
functions; provided, however, that it shall not be an unfair labor practice for an
employee organization or its agents to encourage any individual employed by
the Vermont State Colleges or the University of Vermont to engage in a strike.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379715 v.1